Maryland, session 2025, HB0202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0202*

HOUSE BILL 202
Article – Criminal Law
8–601.
(a) A person, with intent to defraud another, may not counterfeit, cause to be
counterfeited, or willingly aid or assist in counterfeiting any:
(1) bond;
(2) check;
(3) [deed;
(4)] draft;
[(5)] (4) endorsement or assignment of a bond, draft, check, or promissory
note;
[(6)] (5) entry in an account book or ledger;
[(7)] (6) letter of credit;
[(8)] (7) negotiable instrument;
[(9)] (8) power of attorney;
[(10)] (9) promissory note;
[(11)] (10) release or discharge for money or property;
[(12)] (11) title to a motor vehicle;
[(13)] (12) waiver or release of mechanics’ lien; or
[(14)] (13) will or codicil.
(b) A person may not knowingly, willfully, and with fraudulent intent possess a
counterfeit of any of the items listed in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony
and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$1,000 or both.

HOUSE BILL 202 3
(2) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine
not exceeding $1,000 or both.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the prosecution of an alleged
violation of this section or for an alleged violation of a crime based on an act that establishes
a violation of this section may be commenced in any county in which:
(1) an element of the crime occurred;
(2) the [deed or other] alleged counterfeit instrument is recorded in the
county land records, filed with the clerk of the circuit court, or filed with the register of
wills;
(3) the victim resides; or
(4) if the victim is not an individual, the victim conducts business.
8–906.
(A) A PERSON, WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER, MAY NOT:
(1) CLAIM TO SELL OR CONVEY OR ATTEMPT TO SELL OR CONVEY
REAL PROPERTY THAT THE GRANTOR DOES NOT OWN;
(2) CLAIM TO SELL OR CONVEY OR ATTEMPT TO SELL OR CONVEY
REAL PROPERTY THAT THE GRANTOR LACKS SUFFICIENT AUTHORITY TO TRANSFER;
(3) CLAIM TO LEASE OR ATTEMPT TO LEASE REAL PROPERTY THAT
BELONGS TO ANOTHER;
(4) OBTAIN OR ATTEMPT TO OBTAIN, OR SELL OR CONVEY, OR
ATTEMPT TO SELL OR CONVEY THE REAL PROPERTY OF ANOTHER THROUGH THE
EXECUTION OF A DEED BY THE RIGHTFUL OWNER OF THE PROPERTY BY DECEPTION,
INTIMIDATION, THREAT, OR UNDUE INFLUENCE;
(5) COUNTERFEIT A DEED OR CAUSE A DEED TO BE COUNTERFEITED;
OR
(6) COUNTERFEIT A LEASE OR CAUSE A LEASE TO BE
COUNTERFEITED.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AID OR ASSIST ANOTHER IN A
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 202
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY, WILLFULLY, AND WITH FRAUDULENT
INTENT POSSESS A COUNTERFEIT DEED OR LEASE.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE PROSECUTION
OF AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION OR FOR AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF A
CRIME BASED ON AN ACT THAT ESTABLISHES A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BE
COMMENCED IN ANY COUNTY IN WHICH:
(1) AN ELEMENT OF THE CRIME OCCURRED;
(2) THE VICTIM RESIDES; OR
(3) IF THE VICTIM IS NOT AN INDIVIDUAL, THE VICTIM CONDUCTS
BUSINESS.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY FROM FILING A SUIT UNDER § 14–132 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
8–907.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER, POSSESS OR
CLAIM A RIGHT TO POSSESS RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THE PERSON DOES NOT
LAWFULLY POSSESS OR OWN.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90
DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER
THE FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH; AND

HOUSE BILL 202 5
(3) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN 2 YEARS
AFTER THE PRECEDING VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR BOTH.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF:
(I) THE PERSON IN ACTUAL POSSESSION OF THE RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY HAS BEEN GRANTED POSSESSION UNDER A COURT ORDER; OR
(II) A REMEDY IS AVAILABLE UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(2) THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN THE
POSSESSION OF ANOTHER ALLEGEDLY IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION MAY SUBMIT A SWORN AFFIDAVIT TO THE SHERIFF FOR A COUNTY IN
WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED STATING THAT THE PERSON IS FRAUDULENTLY
IN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
SHERIFF SHALL REMOVE A PERSON IN POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY AFTER RECEIVING AN AFFIDAVIT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND RETURN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO THE OWNER.
(II) A SHERIFF MAY NOT REMOVE A PERSON IN POSSESSION OF
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOLLOWING THE FILING OF AN AFFIDAVIT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE PERSON IN POSSESSION PRODUCES
EVIDENCE OF LAWFUL POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO THE SHERIFF.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY FROM FILING A SUIT UNDER § 14–132 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.